src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs-old.lexc.md
Udmurt verb inflection
Udmurt verbs are mainly split into two types: 
* conjugation I, whose stems mostly end on *ы* (ex. *мыны-ны* 'go', *юы-ны* 'drink', *вераськы-ны* 'speak')
* conjugation II, whose stems mostly end on *а/я* (ex. *ужа.ны* 'work', *келя.ны* 'send, put', *кырӟа.ны* 'sing')

Conjugation I verbs also may have a 'short' stem, which subtracts the final
*ы*. The rule is not necessarily as simple as suffixes that begin on
consonants require a vowel-ending stem, because there are some exceptions.
Following is a list of things that use the short stem (so far
incomplete, but feel free to add to it)
* All forms of the *present affirmative*
* All forms of the *present negative*
* All forms of the *future affirmative*
* All forms of the *future negative*
* Preterite II Negative? 
* Caritive gerund? 

And the long stem:
* Infinitive
* Conditional affirmative, negative
* basic gerund, temporal gerund, fourth gerund ?
* gerunds: instrumental -(э)мен/-(е)мен, elative -(э)мысь/-(е)мысь ?

There are some orthographic things to consider, and they show up in the way
verbs are inflected. The palatizing series [d z l n s t] is represented 
in two ways: vowel letters following, or by the palatizing symbol. 

возьыны    ..   возе    ..   возисько
бертыны    ..   бертэ   ..   бертӥсько

LEXICON V_  Verb type is still to be determined.

Typical V_MONO entry is the long stem, ending on <ы>
берты, возьы

бертыны:берт V_MONO  "mennä kotiin" ;

Lexicon *V_MONO*
* Yaml: **mynyny**

Lexicon *V_UZA*
* Yaml: **uzhany**

возь >   ..   возе    ..   возисько
берт >   ..   бертэ   ..   бертӥсько

Lexicon *OPRS*
NB: here we use non-palatal vowels, and shift them to palatal variants in phonology

Lexicon *APRS*

Lexicon *FUTPAST*

Lexicon *FUTPASTSG*

Lexicon *FUTPASTPL*

Lexicon *FUTPASTPLSHORT*

Lexicon *FUT-PERSON*

Lexicon *PRTI-PERSON*

Lexicon *PRTII-PERSON*

Lexicon *COND*

Lexicon *IMPRT*

Lexicon *OPT*

Lexicon *NONFINITES*

Mutual à la Jaska
мыныны:мыны
Lexicon *V_МЫНЫНЫ*
* Yaml: **mynyny**

Lexicon *APRSjaska*

Lexicon *FUT-PERSONjaska*

Lexicon *PRTI-PERSONjaska*

Lexicon *PRTII-PERSONjaska*

Lexicon *CONDjaska*

Lexicon *IMPRTjaska*

Lexicon *OPTjaska*

Lexicon *NONFINITESjaska*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs-old.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-udm/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs-old.lexc)</small>

---
